Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-918
Emergencies; additional appropriations; loans; tax authorized.

The county board may, during the fiscal year, make additional appropriations or increase existing appropriations to meet emergencies in case of such unanticipated requirements as are essential to the preservation and maintenance within the county of the administration of justice, the public safety, the public welfare, and the public health, the funds therefor to be provided from temporary loans. A resolution, setting forth the nature of such emergency, the amount of the additional or increased appropriations required, and the source of obtaining the funds to provide for such appropriations, shall be entered on the proceedings of the county board. Temporary loans, when made, shall be approved by a two-thirds vote of the county board. Such temporary loans shall be repaid from such sources as may be available or, if no other sources are available, by an annual levy of not to exceed seven cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property of such county. Such tax levy, together with the annual levy for any succeeding year, shall not exceed the existing statutory or constitutional limitation applicable to levies for county purposes.

Laws 1937, c. 56, § 11, p. 229;

Laws 1939, c. 24, § 7, p. 131;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-2111;

R.S.1943, § 23-918;

Laws 1945, c. 45, § 13, p. 218;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 50, p. 959;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 124;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 108.